src/phonetics/text2ipa.xfscript
define StopCluster    k %^ c   -> k k %^ h t s || Vow _ Vow ,, 
                      k %^ č   -> k k %^ h t š || Vow _ Vow ,,
                      k %^ š   -> k k %^ š     || Vow _ Vow ,,
                      k %^ s   -> k k %^ s     || Vow _ Vow ,,
                      k %^ s t -> k k %^ s t   || Vow _ Vow ,,
                      k %^ t   -> k k %^ h t   || Vow _ Vow ;
define tkRule         t %^ k   -> t t %^ h k   || Vow _ Vow ;
define tmRule         t %^ m   -> t t %^ m     || Vow _ Vow ;

define 3rdSylld d -> đ || .#. Syll (Cns) Vow %^ _ Vow ;
 # bo.ra.dit -> bo.ra.đih

define rSchwa r -> r ə || Vow _ %^ [             b m | d n | d n j | g ŋ | s k | s t ] Vow ;
define dSchwa đ -> đ ə || Vow _ %^ [ Cns - Alv | b m |       d n j | g ŋ ]             Vow ;
define lSchwa l -> l ə || Vow _ %^ [ Cns - Alv | b m | d n | d n j | g ŋ ]             Vow ;

!áhč^či -> áhh^či
define Preaspiration c -> h || h _ %^ c ,, 
                     č -> h || h _ %^ č ,,
                     p -> h || h _ %^ p ,,
                     t -> h || h _ %^ t ,,
                     k -> h || h _ %^ k ;

define jPreaspiration [..] -> h || Vow Son %^ _ Stop    Vow  ,
                                   Vow Son    _ Stop %^ Stop ;


! Note IPA/SAMPA value of c in next rule!!
define LongPalatalAffricate  d %^ d j -> ɟ ɟ  %^ c  || Vow _ Vow ;
define ShortPalatalAffricate d %^ j   ->   c  %^ c  || Vow _ Vow ;

define SecondaryLengtheningPalAff d %^ j   -> %^SL c c  %^ c
                    || [ .#. |
                         Cns |
                         [Vow - [e|o] ]
                       ] [Vow - á] _  [
                                        [i|u] [ 
                                                [ Cns - j ]
                                                | .#.
                                              ]
                                      | á
                                      | a a
                                      ] ;

! commented out d -> t , g -> k , b -> p || Vow            _ %^ Nas ,,
define PlosiveDevoicing    d -> t ,
                           g -> k ,
                           b -> p
                                  || Vow Son (ə) %^ _    Nas ;
define VoicelessSonorant h l -> L ,
                         h r -> R
                                  || Vow %^ _ ;  

! Latusforlenging
! How can we make this rule non-applicable after Strong grade QIII?
! Now we have pag:.ka:h, but we want pag:.kah, for <baggat>
! We need a rule for allegro shortening to block latus length in imperative
! basa: /pasa/ imperative and /pasaa/ verb genitive
define LatusLengthening a -> a a || .#. Cns* [a|e|o|u|i] (Dummy) Cns* %^ Cns _ ;

define PrimaryLenghtening h ->  h h ||
            [.#.|Cns] [ Vow - á ] _ %^ Stop [ [ [i|u] [[Cns - j]|.#.]] | á | a a] ;
! johtit -> johhtit

define PrimaryLenghteningII l %^ l   ->  %^SL l l     %^ l , 
                            r %^ r   ->  %^SL r r     %^ r , 
                            s %^ s   ->  %^SL s s     %^ s , 
                            v %^ v   ->  %^SL v v     %^ v , 
                            n %^ n   ->  %^SL n n     %^ n , 
                            m %^ m   ->  %^SL m m     %^ m , 
                          n j %^ n j ->  %^SL n j n j %^ n j , 
                            đ %^ đ   ->  %^SL đ đ     %^ đ , 
                            š %^ š   ->  %^SL š š     %^ š
             ||
            [.#.|Cns] [ Vow - á ] _ [ [ [i|u] [[Cns - j]|.#.]] | á | a a] ;

! Triple length?
! Cns1 Cns2 Cns2 -> Cns1 Cns2 Cns2 Cns2 || _ i;
! Cns1 Cns2 Cns2 -> Cns1 Cns2 Cns2 Cns2 || _ u;
! Cns1 Cns2 Cns2 -> Cns1 Cns2 Cns2 Cns2 || _ á;

! vi må liste konsonantpar
!define TripleLength Cns2 Cns2 -> Cns2 Cns2 Cns2 || Cns1 _  [ i [.#.|Cns] | u | á | a a] ;
! + lignende regler for <pp tt cc kk> osv.



! Sekundær forlenging (her må vi liste konsonantpara)
define SecondaryLengthening l b %^ b   -> %^SL l p p %^ p   ,
                            l f %^ f   -> %^SL l f f %^ f   ,
                            l d %^ d   -> %^SL l t t %^ t   ,
                            l g %^ g   -> %^SL l k k %^ k   ,
                            l j %^ j   -> %^SL l j j %^ j   ,
                          l h k %^ k   -> %^SL l L L %^ k   ,
                          l h p %^ p   -> %^SL l L L %^ p   ,
                            l m %^ m   -> %^SL l m m %^ m   ,
                            l n %^ n   -> %^SL l n n %^ n   ,
                            l ŋ %^ ŋ   -> %^SL l ŋ ŋ %^ ŋ   ,
                            l n %^ n j -> %^SL l ɲ ɲ %^ ɲ   ,
                            l s %^ s   -> %^SL l s s %^ s   ,
                            l v %^ v   -> %^SL l v v %^ v   ,
                            l š %^ š   -> %^SL l š š %^ š   ,
                          l h t %^ t   -> %^SL l L L %^ t   ,
                          l h c %^ c   -> %^SL l L L %^ t s ,
                          l h č %^ č   -> %^SL l L L %^ t š ,
                            l z %^ z   -> %^SL l t t %^ t s ,
                            l ž %^ ž   -> %^SL l t t %^ t š ,

                            j b %^ b   -> %^SL j p p %^ p   ,
                            j f %^ f   -> %^SL j f f %^ f   ,
                            j g %^ g   -> %^SL j k k %^ k   ,
                            j l %^ l   -> %^SL j l l %^ l   ,
                          j h k %^ k   -> %^SL j J J %^ k   ,
                          j h p %^ p   -> %^SL j J J %^ p   ,
                            j m %^ m   -> %^SL j m m %^ m   ,
                            j n %^ n   -> %^SL j n n %^ n   ,
                            j ŋ %^ ŋ   -> %^SL j ŋ ŋ %^ ŋ   ,
                          j h n %^ n   -> %^SL j N N %^ N   ,
                            j s %^ s   -> %^SL j s s %^ s   ,
                            j v %^ v   -> %^SL j v v %^ v   ,
                          j h m %^ m   -> %^SL j M M %^ M   ,
                          j h t %^ t   -> %^SL j J J %^ t   ,
                          j h c %^ c   -> %^SL j J J %^ t s ,
                          j h l %^ l   -> %^SL j L L %^ L   ,
                            j z %^ z   -> %^SL j t t %^ t s ,
                            j d %^ d   -> %^SL j t t %^ t   ,
                            j r %^ r   -> %^SL j r r %^ r   ,
                          j s k %^ k   -> %^SL j s s %^ k   ,
                          j s t %^ t   -> %^SL j s s %^ t   ,

                            r b %^ b   -> %^SL r p p %^ p   ,
                            r d %^ d   -> %^SL r t t %^ t   ,
                            r f %^ f   -> %^SL r f f %^ f   ,
                            r g %^ g   -> %^SL r k k %^ k   ,
                            r j %^ j   -> %^SL r j j %^ j   ,
                          r h p %^ p   -> %^SL r R R %^ p   ,
                            r s %^ s   -> %^SL r s s %^ s   ,
                          r h k %^ k   -> %^SL r R R %^ k   ,
                          r h t %^ t   -> %^SL r R R %^ t   ,
                          r h c %^ c   -> %^SL r R R %^ t s ,
                          r s t %^ t   -> %^SL r s s %^ t   ,
                          r s k %^ k   -> %^SL r s s %^ k   ,
                          r h č %^ č   -> %^SL r R R %^ t š ,
                            r v %^ v   -> %^SL r v v %^ v   ,
                            r š %^ š   -> %^SL r š š %^ š   ,
                            r z %^ z   -> %^SL r t t %^ t s ,
                            r ž %^ ž   -> %^SL r t t %^ t š ,

                            m b %^ b   -> %^SL m p p %^ p   ,
                            n d %^ d   -> %^SL n t t %^ t   ,
                            n g %^ g   -> %^SL ŋ k k %^ k   ,
                            n j %^ j   -> %^SL n j j %^ j   ,
                          m h p %^ p   -> %^SL m M M %^ p   ,
                          m š k %^ k   -> %^SL m š š %^ k   ,
                            m s %^ s   -> %^SL m s s %^ s   ,
                            n s %^ s   -> %^SL n s s %^ s   ,
                          n h k %^ k   -> %^SL ŋ Ŋ Ŋ %^ k   ,
                          ŋ h k %^ k   -> %^SL ŋ Ŋ Ŋ %^ k   ,
                          n h t %^ t   -> %^SL n N N %^ t   ,
                          n h c %^ c   -> %^SL n N N %^ t s ,
                          n h č %^ č   -> %^SL n N N %^ t š ,
                          n s t %^ t   -> %^SL n s s %^ t   ,
                          n s k %^ k   -> %^SL n s s %^ k   ,

                            m v %^ v   -> %^SL m v v %^ v   ,
                            m š %^ š   -> %^SL m š š %^ š   ,
                            n š %^ š   -> %^SL n š š %^ š   ,
                            n z %^ z   -> %^SL n t t %^ t s ,
                            n ž %^ ž   -> %^SL n t t %^ t š ,

                            đ b %^ b   -> %^SL đ p p %^ p   ,
                            đ g %^ g   -> %^SL đ k k %^ k   ,
                            đ j %^ j   -> %^SL đ j j %^ j   ,
                            đ v %^ v   -> %^SL đ v v %^ v   ,

                            v n %^ n   -> %^SL w n n %^ n   ,
                            v d %^ d   -> %^SL w t t %^ t   ,
                            v g %^ g   -> %^SL w k k %^ k   ,
                            v j %^ j   -> %^SL w j j %^ j   ,
                            v l %^ l   -> %^SL w l l %^ l   ,
                          v h l %^ l   -> %^SL w L L %^ L   ,
                            v r %^ r   -> %^SL w r r %^ r   ,
                            v z %^ z   -> %^SL w t t %^ t s ,
                            v ž %^ ž   -> %^SL w t t %^ t š ,
                            v š %^ š   -> %^SL w š š %^ š   ,
                            v s %^ s   -> %^SL w s s %^ s   ,
                            v n %^ n j -> %^SL w ɲ ɲ %^ ɲ   ,
                          v s k %^ k   -> %^SL w s s %^ k   ,
                          v s t %^ t   -> %^SL w s s %^ t   ,
                          v h t %^ t   -> %^SL w W W %^ t   ,
                          v h k %^ k   -> %^SL w W W %^ k   ,
                          v h p %^ p   -> %^SL w W W %^ p   ,
                          v h c %^ c   -> %^SL w W W %^ t s ,
                          v h č %^ č   -> %^SL w W W %^ t š ,

                              p %^ p   -> %^SL p p   %^ p	,
                              t %^ t   -> %^SL t t   %^ t	,
                              k %^ k   -> %^SL k k   %^ k	,
                              c %^ c   -> %^SL t t   %^ t s ,
                              č %^ č   -> %^SL t t   %^ t š ,

                              p %^ m   -> %^SL p p   %^ m   ,
                              t %^ n   -> %^SL t t   %^ n   ,
                              t %^ n j -> %^SL t t   %^ n j ,
                              k %^ ŋ   -> %^SL k k   %^ ŋ

   || [.#.|Cns|[Vow - [e|o]]] [Vow - á] _  [ [i|u] [ [ Cns - j ] | .#. ] | á | a a ] ;
   
! Eventually double the SecondaryLenghtening rule with a SecondaryLenghteningForLongA with á in left context and ii (long i) in right: váccii (-secleng) : vácci (+secleng)
! We have secondary lengthening according to young speakers
! Secondary lengthening should not apply before secondary lengthened /aa/



define SecondaryLengtheningNas  p %^ m   ->  %^SL p p %^ m   ,
                                t %^ n   ->  %^SL t t %^ n   ,
                                t %^ n j ->  %^SL t t %^ n j ,
                                k %^ ŋ   ->  %^SL k k %^ ŋ
                                || [.#.|Cns|[Vow - [e|o]]] [Vow - á] [r|j|đ] 
                                 _ [ [i|u] [ [ Cns - j ] | .#. ] | á | a a ]  ;
